Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 36-7-101.
Acceptance of federal grants.

The state of Wyoming hereby accepts the conditions of § 4 of an act of congress entitled “An act making appropriations for sundry civil expenses of the government for the fiscal year ending June 30th, 1895, and for other purposes”; approved August 18th, A.D. 1894 [43 U.S.C. § 641], together with all the grants of land to the state under the provisions of the aforesaid act, and conditions of Section 1 of an act of congress entitled, “An act making appropriations for sundry civil expenses of the government for the fiscal year ending June 30th, 1897, and for other purposes”; approved June 11th, 1896 [43 U.S.C. § 642], and the conditions of an act of congress entitled, “An act making appropriations for sundry civil expenses of the government for the fiscal year ending June 30th, 1909, and for other purposes”; approved May 27th, 1908 [43 U.S.C. § 645], providing for the granting of an additional million (1,000,000) acres of land to the state of Wyoming to be reclaimed as provided in the acts above mentioned, and all acts of congress and parts of acts of congress now or hereafter enacted by congress for the reclamation of desert lands within the state of Wyoming, together with all the grants of land to the state of Wyoming, and any and all interests therein, with all rights and privileges thereunder, under the provisions of the aforesaid acts or parts of acts.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 934; Laws 1909, ch. 160, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 661; C.S. 1920, § 769; R.S. 1931, § 91-701; C.S. 1945, § 24-401; W.S. 1957, § 36-83.

Cross references. —

As to acceptance of lands from United States, and as to sale of such lands, see art. 18, § 1, Wyo. Const.

Federal acts. —

The 1894, 1897 and 1909 federal acts referred to in this section appear as 43 U.S.C. § 641, 43 U.S.C. § 642 and 43 U.S.C. § 645, respectively.

Applied

in

Walliker v. Escott, 608 P.2d 1272,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Lakeview Canal Co. v. R. Hardesty Mfg. Co., 31 Wyo. 182, 224 P. 853,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1924); Bruegman v. Johnson Ranches, Inc., 520 P.2d 489,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1974).

§ 36-7-102.
Selection, management and disposal of lands.

The selection, management and disposal of said land shall be vested in the state board of land commissioners, as constituted by section 3 of article 18 of the constitution of the state of Wyoming. Said state board of land commissioners shall be hereinafter designated as “the board”.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 935; C.S. 1910, § 662; C.S. 1920, § 770; R.S. 1931, § 91-702; C.S. 1945, § 24-402; W.S. 1957, § 36-84.

Editor's notes. —

In R.S. 1931, §§ 91-702 and 91-703 (§§

36-7-102

and

36-7-201

) were reworded, apparently to comply with the changes made by the amendment to art. 18, § 3, Wyo. Const., by Laws 1921, p. 293, and with the provisions of Laws 1929, ch. 108, §§ 2 and 5, which designated the members of the board of land commissioners, prescribed its powers and provided for the meetings of the board and the rules and regulations therefor. These sections were restored by the 1945 compiler to read as originally enacted, and Laws 1929, ch. 108, §§ 2 and 5, are set out herein as §§

36-2-101

and

36-2-104

.

Stated

in

Dechert v. Christopulos, 604 P.2d 1039,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 36-7-103.
Institution of legal proceedings.

All suits or actions brought by the board, under the provisions of this act, shall be instituted by the board, in the name of the people of the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 26; R.S. 1899, § 967; C.S. 1910, § 693; C.S. 1920, § 806; R.S. 1931, § 91-738; C.S. 1945, § 24-434; W.S. 1957, § 36-85.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act,” referred in this section, means Laws 1895, ch. 38, which appears herein as this chapter (chapter 7 of title 36).

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 27, repeals all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 36-7-104.
Disposition of forfeitures.

All moneys received by the state of Wyoming as proceeds from forfeited bonds, pledges or other forfeitures of whatsoever kind in connection with the operations under the act commonly known as the “Carey Act” shall become a part of the general fund.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 53, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 777; R.S. 1931, § 91-709; C.S. 1945, § 24-440; W.S. 1957, § 36-86; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2.

Carey Act. —

See note following chapter heading.